Idaho, session 2026, H0956.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 16-1649, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-1649. NOTIFICATION OF RIGHTS. (1) When the department, in accor-
dance with this chapter, commences an investigation after having received
information that a child may be abused, neglected, or abandoned and in the
course of such investigation contacts, directly and in person, the parents,
guardians, or any persons having legal custody of the child, then the de-
partment shall notify such parents, guardians, or persons that they have the
right to:
(a) Refuse to answer questions;
(b) Obtain an attorney at their own expense, consult with such attor-
ney, and have such attorney present during an investigation; provided,
however, that the department is not authorized to appoint or obtain an
attorney for such parents, guardians, or persons;
(c) Refuse entry to their home or other real property; and
(d) Refuse the questioning of any minor children in their home or on
their property, unless there is an order issued by a court of competent
jurisdiction authorizing a particular entry or particular questioning
or examination.
(2) The notification required by subsection (1) of this section shall
be made in writing at the time of or within seventy-two (72) hours after the
department makes the first contact directly and in person with the parents,
guardians, or other persons having legal custody of the child.


(3) A parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of the
child may expressly assert the rights provided in this section.
(4) The notification required by subsection (1) of this section shall
be made in writing on a form prescribed by the department. Such notification
shall state that if the safety of the child cannot be determined, the depart-
ment may request assistance from a law enforcement agency or seek a court or-
der.
(5)(a) When the department commences an investigation after having re-
ceived information that a child may be abandoned, the department shall
make reasonable efforts to inquire as to why the parent or guardian
abandoned the child and where the parent or guardian was during the time
of the alleged abandonment.
(b) The department or its authorized agents, including social workers,
shall not explicitly or impliedly inform a parent or guardian who has
abandoned or allegedly abandoned a child that there will be no penalties
under the law or other adverse outcomes as a result of abandonment dur-
ing the course of such investigation.
(5) (6) Failure by the department to provide the notification re-
quired by this section in a specific investigation shall not affect the
department's ability to conduct such investigation or to carry out the de-
partment's duties as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 32, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-3206A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-3206A. REQUIRED TRAINING. (1) All social workers licensed under
the provisions of this chapter shall:
(a) Be trained in autism, the autism spectrum, and introversion. Such
social workers shall:
(i) Complete one (1) autism and one (1) introversion training
within thirty (30) days of employment as a social worker; and
(ii) Biannually enroll in and complete one (1) autism and one (1)
introversion training thereafter;
(b) Annually enroll in and successfully complete the digital course
"foundations of autism" online through the autism society website or
an equivalent course. The equivalent course shall include training on
what autism is and the basic concepts and characteristics of autism, in-
cluding sensory processing, communication, emotional regulation, and
social interactions in individuals with autism. Upon completion of the
course the board or the providers of the course shall issue a certifi-
cate of completion. The board shall create a form that requires a social
worker to sign to acknowledge an understanding of the course and what
autism is and to acknowledge that an individual shall not be removed
from the custody of a parent, guardian, or custodian based solely on the
individual being autistic; and
(c) Annually review "introverts vs. extroverts: understanding the
spectrum" online through the positive psychology website or an equiv-
alent guide. The equivalent guide shall include training on what in-
troversion is, the basic concepts and characteristics of introversion,
the spectrum of introversion, including ambiverts, and training on the


traits, characteristics, behaviors, communication styles, emotional
regulation, and social interactions of introverts. Upon completion,
the board or the providers shall issue a certificate of completion. The
board shall create a form that requires a social worker to sign to ac-
knowledge an understanding of what introversion is and to acknowledge
that an individual shall not be removed from the custody of a parent,
guardian, or custodian based solely on the individual being an intro-
vert.
(2) The director of the Idaho department of health and welfare shall at-
tend the annual child welfare league of America conference.
(3) Nothing in this section shall limit the board's powers and duties
pursuant to section 54-3204, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-3210, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3210. CODE OF PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT. (1) The board shall prepare and
adopt a code of professional conduct and may revise and amend such code from
time to time. Preparation, revision, amendment, and distribution of said
code of professional conduct shall be pursuant to the provisions of this sec-
tion, and chapters 26 and 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(2) It shall be a violation of the code of professional conduct if a so-
cial worker:
(a) Instructs a judge how to rule in a particular case;
(b) Speaks negatively to or about parents, guardians, minors, or anyone
else involved in any child protection case;
(c) Tells a minor child that the child will not be returning home;
(d) Lacks competency in Idaho Code and rules involving child protec-
tion; or
(e) Makes false or misleading statements to parents or guardians about
the parent's or guardian's legal rights or responsibilities.
SECTION 4. That Section 54-3217, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3217. VIOLATIONS OF ACT A MISDEMEANOR PENALTIES AND REMEDIES. (1)
Any person who shall engage in the profession of social work as herein de-
fined without a license as provided for by this act chapter, or the rules
or regulations of the board herein provided for, shall be guilty of a misde-
meanor.
(2) A violation of section 54-3218(1), Idaho Code, by a licensed social
worker may result in:
(a) A finding of a violation of the rules of professional conduct
adopted by the board;
(b) The board suspending, refusing to renew, or revoking any license
issued pursuant to this chapter;
(c) Loss of employment; or
(d) Other disciplinary action.
(3) Any parent or guardian aggrieved by a violation of section 54-3218,
Idaho Code, by a licensed social worker shall have a cause of action against
the person alleged to have committed the violation.


SECTION 5. That Chapter 32, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-3218, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-3218. DUTIES AND LIMITATIONS. (1) Any person licensed pursuant to
this chapter shall include only factual findings supported by clear and con-
vincing evidence in any official or unofficial report, to a court or tri-
bunal, or by any other method in which the person is performing in the per-
son's official capacity as a social worker pursuant to chapter 16, title 16,
Idaho Code.
(2) A report from a social worker shall follow all rules adopted by the
board, the Idaho department of health and welfare, and Idaho Code.
(3) If a licensed social worker does not abide by the decisions of such
social worker's supervisors, or makes a decision notwithstanding the deci-
sion by such supervisors in child protection cases, such social worker shall
immediately be subject to termination, unless the decision by the supervisor
violates a law, rule, or legal right.
(4) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the duties of
the department of health and welfare and its authorized agents as described
in chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 56-1004, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1004. DIRECTOR -- ADDITIONAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (1) The director
shall exercise the following powers and duties in addition to all other pow-
ers and duties inherent in the position:
(a) Prescribe such rules as may be necessary for the administration of
the department, the conduct and duties of the employees, the orderly and
efficient management of department business, and the custody, use and
preservation of department records, papers, books and property belong-
ing to the state;
(b) Maintain written documentation of the essential functions and psy-
chological demands of social workers employed by the department;
(b) (c) Employ such personnel as may be deemed necessary, prescribe
their duties and fix their compensation within the limits provided by
the state personnel system law;
(c) (d) Administer oaths for all purposes required in the discharge of
his duties;
(d) (e) Prescribe the qualifications of all personnel of the depart-
ment on a nonpartisan merit basis, in accordance with the Idaho person-
nel system law, provided however, that the administrators in charge of
any division of the department, and the administrators in charge of the
state hospital north, state hospital south, state hospital west, and
southwest Idaho treatment center shall serve at the pleasure of the di-
rector;
(e) (f) Create such units, sections and subdivisions as are or may be
necessary for the proper and efficient functioning of the department.
(2) The department is empowered to acquire, by purchase, lease or ex-
change, any property which in the judgment of the department is needful for
the operation of the facilities and programs for which it is responsible and


to dispose of, by sale, lease or exchange, any property which in the judgment
of the department is not needful for the operation of the same.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 10, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-1004B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-1004B. SOCIAL WORKERS -- PSYCHOLOGICAL SUITABILITY EVALUA-
TION. (1) The department shall require a psychological suitability evalu-
ation for social workers licensed pursuant to chapter 32, title 54, Idaho
Code, after the department has extended a conditional offer of employment.
(2) The psychological suitability evaluation shall be limited to as-
sessing an applicant's capacity to meet the documented job-related demands
for social workers. The evaluation shall assess only job-related psycho-
logical traits and functional capacities, which may include emotional reg-
ulation, interpersonal effectiveness, stress tolerance, profession bound-
aries, and ethical reliability.
(3) The evaluation shall not:
(a) Be used to exclude an applicant solely on the basis of a mental
health diagnosis or history of treatment;
(b) Include inquiries unrelated to the essential duties of social work;
(c) Require disclosure of irrelevant medical or personal information;
or
(d) Be used to predict speculative future impairment.
(4) The psychological evaluator shall be independent of the hiring au-
thority and shall not have a current treating relationship with the appli-
cant. The psychological suitability evaluation shall be conducted by:
(a) A licensed psychologist; or
(b) A licensed psychiatrist.
(5) The evaluator shall provide the department with a written report
that shall only include:
(a) A written opinion limited to one (1) of the following determina-
tions:
(i) The social worker is psychologically suitable or recommended
for the position; or
(ii) The social worker is not psychologically suitable or not
recommended for the position at the time of evaluation; and
(b) An explanation of background and job-related factors supporting
the determination.
(6) Diagnostic labels, raw test data, and detailed clinical findings
shall not be disclosed to the department. Records relating to psychological
evaluations shall be maintained as confidential medical records and shall be
kept separate from personnel files. Access to such records shall be limited
to department personnel with a legitimate business need for the information.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "psychological suitability eval-
uation" means a standardized professional assessment conducted to determine
whether an applicant demonstrates the psychological characteristics and
functional capacity necessary to perform the essential duties of a social
worker.


SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.